Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1640
Orders and approval; effect.

The findings and orders of the Chief Water Officer, an application approval, and an approval to operate any dam issued by the Chief Water Officer are final, conclusive, and binding upon all owners and state agencies, regulatory or otherwise, as to the safety of design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any dam.

The Chief Water Officer may report all dam incidents as defined by the National Performance of Dams Program to the National Performance of Dams Program archive.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 40;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 280.